New Jersey, session 221, A2257.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.33:1-42 is amended to read as follows: 33:1-42.      [No sales] a. Sales of alcoholic beverages shall not be made in any public buildings belonging to or under the control of the [state] State or any political subdivision thereof except as to the national guard as hereinbefore provided, and except as  permitted by the [commissioner] director in specified cases and subject to rules and regulations. b.    The governing body of a county or municipality may enter into an agreement with the holder of a concessionaire permit issued pursuant to subsection a. of this section for use in connection with a premises owned or operated by the governing body to share a fixed percentage of the revenue from the sale of alcoholic beverages by the permit holder. (cf: R.S.33:1-42) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.